Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1316
Status review; child's needs; determination.

The court shall, when reviewing the foster care status of a child, determine whether the individual physical, psychological, and sociological needs of the child are being met. The health and safety of the child are of paramount concern in such review.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 16;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 43.